District of Columbia statutes.
22-4005

Duties of the Department of Corrections.

(a)

Immediately before the release into the community of a sex offender in its custody or under its supervision, or immediately before the transfer of a sex offender to a halfway house, whichever is earlier, the Department of Corrections shall notify the Agency of the sex offender’s proposed release, and shall provide to the Agency such records and information as will assist the Agency in carrying out its responsibilities under this chapter.

(b)

Immediately before the release into the community of a sex offender in its custody or under its supervision or immediately before a sex offender transfers to a halfway house, whichever is earlier, the Department of Corrections shall inform the sex offender orally and in writing of the duty to register and of the time when and place where he or she is to appear to register and shall require the sex offender to read and sign the notice.

July 11, 2000, D.C. Law 13-137, § 6, 47 DCR 797